Arkansas, session 2025, SB525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-38-101 is amended to read as follows:
14-38-101. Petition for incorporation.
(a)(1) When the inhabitants of a part of any county not embraced
within the limits of any city or incorporated town shall desire to be
organized into a city or incorporated town, they may apply, by a petition in
writing, signed by the greater of either two hundred (200) seventy-five (75)
or a majority of the qualified voters residing within the described
territory, to the county court of the proper county.
(2) The petition shall:
(A) Describe the territory proposed to be embraced in the
incorporated town and have annexed to it an accurate map or plat of the
territory;
(B) State the name proposed for the incorporated town; and
*SSS103*
04-02-2025 10:15:08 SSS103

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 SB525
(C) Name the persons authorized to act in behalf of the
petitioners in prosecuting the petition.
(b)(1) Unless the governing body of the municipal corporation has
affirmatively consented to the incorporation by written resolution or the
area that seeks to be incorporated contains a population of one thousand five
hundred (1,500) or more, the court Secretary of State shall not approve the
incorporation of a municipality if any portion of the territory proposed to
be embraced in the incorporated town lies within:
(A) Three (3) miles of an existing municipal corporation;
or
(B) The area in which that existing municipal corporation
is exercising its planning territorial jurisdiction.
(2) The planning territorial jurisdiction limitation shall not
apply if the area proposed to be incorporated is land upon which a real
estate development by a single developer, containing not less than four
thousand (4,000) acres, has been or is being developed under a comprehensive
plan for a community containing streets and other public services, parks, and
other recreational facilities for common use by the residents of the
community, churches, schools, and commercial and residential facilities, and
which has been subdivided into sufficient lots for residential use to
accommodate a projected population of not fewer than one thousand (1,000)
persons, and for which a statement of record has been filed with the United
States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development under the Interstate Land
Sales Full Disclosure Act.
(c)(1) When any petition shall be presented to the court, it shall be
filed in the office of the county clerk, to be kept there, subject to the
inspection of any persons interested, until the time appointed for the
hearing of it.
(2) The county clerk shall verify the signatures of the petition
within thirty (30) days of receipt of the petition.
(3) If the petition is verified by the county clerk under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the county clerk shall submit a copy of
the verified petition to the Secretary of State.
(d)(1) At or before the time of the filing, the court Secretary of
State shall fix and communicate to the petitioners, or their agent, a time
and place for the hearing of the petition, which time shall not be less than
04-02-2025 10:15:08 SSS103

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 SB525
thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition.
(2)(A)(i) Thereupon, the The petitioners or their agent shall
cause a notice to be published in some newspaper of general circulation in
the county for not less than three (3) consecutive weeks.
(ii) If there is no newspaper of general circulation
in the county, a notice shall be posted at some public place within the
limits of the proposed incorporated town for at least three (3) weeks before
the time of the hearing.
(B) The notice shall contain the substance of the petition
and state the time and place appointed for the hearing.
(3) The Secretary of State shall publish notice of the hearing
at least three (3) weeks before the hearing on the Secretary of State's
website.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-38-103 is amended to read as follows:
14-38-103. Hearing on petition.
(a)(1) Every incorporation hearing under this chapter shall be public
and may be adjourned from time to time.
(2) Any person interested may appear and contest the granting of
the prayer of the petition, and affidavits in support of or against the
petition, which may be prepared and submitted, shall be examined by the
county court Secretary of State.
(b)(1) In its At his or her discretion, the court Secretary of State
may permit the agent named in the original petition to amend or change it.
(2) However, no No amendment shall be permitted whereby
territory not before embraced shall be added or the character of the proposed
city or incorporated town changed from special to general, or from general to
special, without appointing another time for a hearing and requiring new
notice to be given as provided in § 14-38-101.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-38-104 is amended to read as follows:
14-38-104. Order of incorporation — Transcript.
(a) The county court Secretary of State shall make out and endorse on
the petition an order to the effect that the city or incorporated town as
named and described in the petition may be organized if the court Secretary
of State shall be satisfied after hearing the petition that:
04-02-2025 10:15:08 SSS103

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 SB525
(1) The greater of either two hundred (200) seventy-five (75) or
a majority of the qualified voters residing within the described territory
have signed the petition;
(2) The limits have been accurately described and an accurate
map or plat of the limits made and filed;
(3) The name proposed for the city or incorporated town is
proper and sufficient to distinguish it from others of like kind in the
state; and
(4) Moreover, that it shall be deemed right and proper in the
judgment and discretion of the court that the petition shall be granted The
proposed business plan sufficiently addresses the continuation of services
which may include without limitation:
(A) Police services;
(B) Fire services;
(C) Utilities; and
(D) Trash services.
(b)(1) The order shall be signed and delivered by the court Secretary
of State, together with the petition and the map or plat, to the recorder of
the county, whose duty it shall be to record it as soon as possible in the
proper book or records and to file and preserve in his or her office the
original papers, having certified thereon that it has been properly recorded.
(2)(A) It shall also be the duty of the recorder to make out and
certify, under his or her official seal, two (2) transcripts of the record.
(B) The recorder shall forward one (1) copy to the
Secretary of State and deliver one (1) copy to the agent of the petitioners,
with a certificate thereon that a similar transcript has been forwarded to
the Secretary of State as provided by this section.
(c) A petition for incorporation under this chapter shall not be
denied because the proposed boundaries of the municipality fall within more
than one (1) county.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-38-107(b), concerning hearing on a
complaint for incorporation, is amended to read as follows:
(b) If it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court or judge that
the proposed city or incorporated town does not contain the requisite number
of inhabitants, that a majority of them have not signed the original
04-02-2025 10:15:08 SSS103

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 SB525
petition, or that the limits of the proposed city or incorporated town are
unreasonably large or small or are not properly and sufficiently not
accurately described, then the court or judge shall order the record of the
incorporated town to be annulled.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-38-117 is amended to read as follows:
14-38-117. Effective date of incorporation required.
(a)(1) The county court order of incorporation affecting territory
under this chapter shall include the effective date upon which the petition
for incorporation is granted and the municipality is considered organized.
(2) County court orders An order issued under this chapter that
fail fails to include a specified effective date in the order shall require
using the date of the county clerk's file mark as the effective date for all
purposes.
(b) The effective date specified in the order of incorporation issued
under § 14-38-104 is the official effective date to be used by any county or
state official charged with recording, forwarding, maintaining, or
instituting the order of incorporation.
(c)(1) In the event of a circuit court challenge to the county court
order of incorporation, the final order of the circuit court shall specify a
change to the effective date, if any.
(2) In the absence of a specific attestation, the county court-
ordered effective date that appears on the signed order of incorporation is
the effective date.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 38, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-38-118. Rules.
The Secretary of State may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

/s/M. Johnson




04-02-2025 10:15:08 SSS103